test/src/morphology/N-muarju_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - muarju: # Noun 'berry / marja' - full paradigm
     muarju+N+Sg+Nom: muarju
     muarju+N+Sg+Gen: muarjan
     muarju+N+Sg+Acc: [muarju, muarjan]
     muarju+N+Sg+Par: muarjua
     muarju+N+Sg+Tra: muarjakse
     muarju+N+Sg+Abe: [muarjatta, muarjata, muarjattah]
     muarju+N+Sg+Com: muarjanke
     muarju+N+Sg+Ine: muarjas
     muarju+N+Sg+Ela: [muarjaspäi, muarjas]
     muarju+N+Sg+Ill: muarjuh
     muarju+N+Sg+Ade: muarjal
     muarju+N+Sg+Abl: [muarjalpäi, muarjal]
     muarju+N+Sg+All: muarjale
     muarju+N+Sg+Ess: muarjannu
     muarju+N+Sg+Ter: muarjassah
     muarju+N+Sg+Apr: muarjalluo
     muarju+N+Pl+Nom: muarjat
     muarju+N+Pl+Gen: muarjoin
     muarju+N+Pl+Acc: muarjat
     muarju+N+Pl+Par: muarjoi
     muarju+N+Pl+Tra: muarjoikse
     muarju+N+Pl+Abe: [muarjoitta, muarjoita, muarjoittah]
     muarju+N+Pl+Com: muarjoinke
     muarju+N+Pl+Ine: muarjois
     muarju+N+Pl+Ela: [muarjoispäi, muarjois]
     muarju+N+Pl+Ill: muarjoih
     muarju+N+Pl+Ade: muarjoil
     muarju+N+Pl+Abl: [muarjoilpäi, muarjoil]
     muarju+N+Pl+All: muarjoile
     muarju+N+Pl+Ess: muarjoinnu
     muarju+N+Pl+Ins: muarjoin
     muarju+N+Pl+Apr: muarjoilluo
     muarju+N+Sg+Nom+Clt/gi: muarjugi
     muarju+N+Sg+Gen+Clt/gi: muarjangi
     muarju+N+Sg+Acc+Clt/gi: [muarjugi, muarjangi]
     muarju+N+Sg+Par+Clt/gi: muarjuagi
     muarju+N+Sg+Tra+Clt/gi: muarjaksegi
     muarju+N+Sg+Abe+Clt/gi: [muarjattagi, muarjatagi, muarjattahgi]
     muarju+N+Sg+Com+Clt/gi: muarjankegi
     muarju+N+Sg+Ine+Clt/gi: muarjasgi
     muarju+N+Sg+Ela+Clt/gi: [muarjaspäigi, muarjasgi]
     muarju+N+Sg+Ill+Clt/gi: muarjahgi
     muarju+N+Sg+Ade+Clt/gi: muarjalgi
     muarju+N+Sg+Abl+Clt/gi: [muarjalpäigi, muarjalgi]
     muarju+N+Sg+All+Clt/gi: muarjalegi
     muarju+N+Sg+Ess+Clt/gi: muarjannugi
     muarju+N+Sg+Ter+Clt/gi: muarjassahgi
     muarju+N+Sg+Apr+Clt/gi: muarjalluogi
     muarju+N+Pl+Nom+Clt/gi: muarjatgi
     muarju+N+Pl+Gen+Clt/gi: muarjoingi
     muarju+N+Pl+Acc+Clt/gi: muarjatgi
     muarju+N+Pl+Par+Clt/gi: muarjoigi
     muarju+N+Pl+Tra+Clt/gi: muarjoiksegi
     muarju+N+Pl+Abe+Clt/gi: [muarjoittagi, muarjoitagi, muarjoittahgi]
     muarju+N+Pl+Com+Clt/gi: muarjoinkegi
     muarju+N+Pl+Ine+Clt/gi: muarjoisgi
     muarju+N+Pl+Ela+Clt/gi: [muarjoispäigi, muarjoisgi]
     muarju+N+Pl+Ill+Clt/gi: muarjoihgi
     muarju+N+Pl+Ade+Clt/gi: muarjoilgi
     muarju+N+Pl+Abl+Clt/gi: [muarjoilpäigi, muarjoilgi]
     muarju+N+Pl+All+Clt/gi: muarjoilegi
     muarju+N+Pl+Ess+Clt/gi: muarjoinnugi
     muarju+N+Pl+Ins+Clt/gi: muarjoingi
     muarju+N+Pl+Apr+Clt/gi: muarjoilluogi
